Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2131
Trespass; taking timber for repair of public highways or bridges; liability.

Nothing herein contained authorizes the recovery of more than the just value of the timber taken from uncultivated woodland for the repair of a public highway or bridge in its immediate neighborhood.

R.S.1867, Code § 637, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8248;

C.S.1922, § 9201;

C.S.1929, § 20-2133;

R.S.1943, § 25-2131.